Missouri, session 2026, SB1796.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 168, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 168.780, to read as
follows:
168.780. 1. Personally identifiable information of a
teacher collected by a public school or school district
shall not be sold or disclosed by any public school, school
district, or third-party entity to any party for any
commercial use, including, but not limited to, marketing or
solicitation; compiling, selling, or renting lists;
developing or enhancing products or services; or creating or
using individual, household, or group profiles.
2. If a public school or school district conducts a
background check on a teacher for purposes relating to such
teacher's work-related travel or transportation of students
for educational purposes, under no circumstances shall such
background check be reported, transmitted, or otherwise
treated as a credit inquiry or have any direct or indirect
effect on the teacher's credit score.
✓